Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.320

Write-in candidates—Notice to auditors, ballot counters.

The secretary of state shall notify each county auditor of any declarations filed with the secretary under RCW 29A.24.311 for offices appearing on the ballot in that county. The county auditor shall ensure that those persons charged with counting the ballots for a primary or election are notified of all valid write-in candidates before the tabulation of those ballots.

[ 2013 c 11 s 33; 2003 c 111 s 623. Prior: 1988 c 181 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.04.190.]